Maine, session 132, LD477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC SAFETY, DEPARTMENT OF
State Police 0291
Initiative: Provides funding for 15 State Trooper positions, 9 State Police Corporal
positions and related All Other to enhance public safety in rural counties of the State and
to support county sheriff department efforts. Four corporals and 4 troopers would patrol
the Northern Field Troop area; one corporal and 3 troopers would patrol Aroostook County;
4 troopers and 4 corporals would patrol Somerset and Franklin counties; and 4 troopers
would patrol Androscoggin County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 24.000 24.000
Personal Services $1,888,351 $1,948,778
All Other $78,000 $78,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,966,351 $2,026,778
1182
HIGHWAY FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $1,016,804 $1,049,341
All Other $42,000 $42,000
__________ __________
HIGHWAY FUND TOTAL $1,058,804 $1,091,341